Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-124.14
Applicants outside cities and villages; airport authorities; Nebraska State Fair Board; issuance of licenses; when permitted.

(1) The commission may license the sale of alcoholic liquor at retail in the original package to applicants who reside in any county in which there is no incorporated city or village or in which the county seat is not located in an incorporated city or village if the licensed premises are situated in an unincorporated village having a population of twenty-five inhabitants or more as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census.

(2) The commission may license the sale of beer at retail in any county outside the corporate limits of any city or village therein and license the sale of alcoholic liquor at retail for consumption on the premises and off the premises, sales in the original package only.

(3) The commission may license the sale of alcoholic liquor for consumption on the premises as provided in subdivision (6)(a)(iii) of section 53-124 on lands controlled by airport authorities when such land is located on and under county jurisdiction or by the Nebraska State Fair Board.

Laws 1991, LB 582, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 278, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 61;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 47.